District of Columbia statutes.
46-421

Violations; prosecutions.

Whoever fails to comply with §§ 46-416, 46-416.01, and 46-420 shall be imprisoned for not more than 6 months, or fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both. Prosecutions for violations of this section shall be conducted by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 960, Pub. L. 89-682, § 6
July 7, 1967, 81 Stat. 122, Pub. L. 90-53, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, § 155(a)
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 72, 52 DCR 2638
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 32, 59 DCR 5567
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-148, § 3(b), 61 DCR 8314

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-121.
1973 Ed., § 30-123.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “relating to any person who has, or suspected to have, syphilis” for “relating to any person suffering, or suspected to be suffering from, syphilis.”
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-148 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.